Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-152
National Guard; federal service; termination; enlistments unaffected.

Upon the termination of any emergency for which the National Guard has been drafted or called into the service of the United States, all persons so drafted or called, upon being discharged from the Army or Air Force of the United States, shall continue to serve in the Nebraska National Guard until the dates upon which their enlistments entered into prior to their draft or call into service would have expired if uninterrupted.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 14, p. 661;

C.S.1929, § 55-119;

R.S.1943, § 55-130;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 13, p. 597;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-130;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 50, p. 1598;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 5.